Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 9. Penalties

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Hazardous Waste — The Supreme Court's Interpretation of RCRA: An Inequitable Result. KFC Western, Inc. v. Meghrig, 516 U.S. 479, 116 S. Ct. 1251, 134 L. Ed. 2d 121, 1996 U.S. LEXIS 1955 (1996),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 699 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Private entity's status as owner or operator under § 107(a)(1, 2) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (42 USCS § 9607(a)(1, 2) (CERCLA), 140 ALR Fed 181.

What constitutes “facility” within meaning of § 101(9) of the Comprehensive, Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 U.S.C. § 9601(9)), 147 ALR Fed 469.

Equitable considerations in allocating response costs to owner or occupant of previously contaminated facility in action pursuant to § 113(f) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA)(42 U.S.C. § 9613(f), 148 ALR Fed 203.

39A C.J.S. Health and Environment §§ 139 to 157.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
172.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-901.
Violations of provisions; penalties.

Any person who violates, or any director, officer or agent of a corporate permittee who willfully and knowingly authorizes, orders or carries out the violation of any provision of this act, or any rule, regulation, standard or permit adopted hereunder or who violates any determination or order of the council pursuant to this act or any rule, regulation, standard, permit, license or variance is subject to a penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation for each day during which violation continues, a temporary or permanent injunction, or both a penalty and an injunction subject to the following:

Except that any person who violates any provision of article 2 of this chapter or any provision of the state hazardous waste program authorized pursuant to the Resource Conservation Recovery Act, Subtitle C, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 [6921] et seq., as amended, or any rule, regulation, standard or permit adopted pursuant to those provisions, or who violates any determination or order of the council pursuant to article 2 of this chapter or the state hazardous waste program is subject to a penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation for each day during which the violation continues, a temporary or permanent injunction, or both a penalty and an injunction; and

Penalties and injunctive relief under this subsection are to be determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in a civil action, provided that nothing herein shall preclude the department from negotiating stipulated settlements involving the payment of a penalty, implementation of compliance schedules or other settlement conditions in lieu of litigation.

through (h) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 28, § 4.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates, or any director, officer or agent of a corporate permittee who willfully and knowingly authorizes, orders or carries out the violation of any provision of this act or any rule, regulation, standard, permit, license, or variance or limitations adopted hereunder or who willfully violates any determination or order of the council or court issued pursuant to this act or any rule, regulation, standard, permit or limitation issued under this act shall be fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) per day of violation, or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both. For a subsequent conviction for a violation of this act, the person shall be subject to a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) per day of violation, imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, or both. For multiple violations, penalties may be assessed up to the maximum amount specified in this subsection for each day of each separate violation.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation or certification in any application, record, report, plan or other document filed or required to be maintained under this act or who falsifies, tampers with, or knowingly renders inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained under this act, shall upon conviction, be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) per day for each violation or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both.

through (q) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 28, § 4.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.49; Laws 1974, ch. 14, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 198, § 2; Laws 1980, ch. 64, § 2; 1982, ch. 73, § 2; 1994, ch. 82, § 2; 1995, ch. 28, §§ 2, 4.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for contamination of streams or lakes by manufacturing or industrial works, see §

35-4-202

.

As to injunctions, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Subtitle C of the Resource Conservation Recovery Act, referred to in paragraph (a)(i), is codified at 42 U.S.C. § 6921 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Section provides review of written notice of violation. —

There is no provision in §

35-11-701

for a review by the environmental quality council of the allegations contained in a written notice of violation issued pursuant to §

35-11-701

(c)(i), because this section provides the alleged violator with a review of the allegation prior to the assessment of any penalty. People v. Fremont Energy Corp., 651 P.2d 802,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1982).

Administrative remedies not prerequisite to action under section. —

The state is not required to exhaust any of the administrative remedies set forth in §

35-11-701

before commencing a civil action under this section to collect penalties for violating this chapter. People v. Fremont Energy Corp., 651 P.2d 802,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1982).

Department of environmental quality may proceed at any time after discovering violation

of this chapter to seek enforcement of this chapter by seeking penalties for its violation in a civil action before a court as provided in this section. People v. Fremont Energy Corp., 651 P.2d 802,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1982).

Doctrines of exhaustion of administrative remedies and primary jurisdiction inapplicable. —

Neither the doctrine of exhaustion of administrative remedies nor the doctrine of primary jurisdiction are applicable in an action seeking penalties from an energy corporation for violation of this chapter. People v. Fremont Energy Corp., 651 P.2d 802,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1982).

Owners of pipelines which discharge oil into state waters are liable regardless of fault

for damages and for the civil penalties set out in this section. People v. Platte Pipe Line Co., 649 P.2d 208,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1982).

Action, initiated prior to statutory enactment, dismissed. —

A gas station operator charged with violating §§

35-11-301

and

35-11-901

was entitled to have his action dismissed and his supersedeas bond released where an appeal of the damage decision against him was pending when these sections were enacted. V-1 Oil Co. v. People, 799 P.2d 1199,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1990).

Applied

in

Nickelson v. People, 607 P.2d 904,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1980); Stalkup v. State Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 838 P.2d 705,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Environmental Law — Strict Liability for Oil Spills in Wyoming. People v. Platte Pipe Line Company, 649 P.2d 208,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 805 (1983).

For comment, “The Use of Opinion Testimony for Valuing Real Property in an Eminent Domain Suit,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 43 (1984).

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

For comment, “Putting Polluters in Jail: The Imposition of Criminal Sanctions on Corporate Defendants Under Environmental Statutes,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 93 (1985).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Recovery in trespass for injury to land caused by airborne pollutants, 2 ALR4th 1054.

State and local government control of pollution from underground storage tanks, 11 ALR5th 388.

Application of statute of limitations in private tort actions based on injury to persons or property caused by underground flow of contaminants, 11 ALR5th 438.

What constitutes “suit” triggering insurer's duty to defend environmental claims — state cases, 48 ALR5th 355.

§ 35-11-902.
Surface coal mining operations; violations of provisions; penalties.

Notwithstanding W.S.

35-11-901

, violations by surface coal mining operations of article 4 of this act, or of any rule, regulation, standard, order, license, variance or permit issued thereunder, shall be governed by this section.

Any person who violates, or any director, officer or agent of a corporate permittee who willfully and knowingly authorizes, orders or carries out the violation of any provision of article 4 of this act for surface coal mining operations, or any rule, regulation, standard, license, variance or permit issued thereunder, or who violates any determination or order of the council pursuant to article 4 of this act for surface coal mining operations is subject to either a penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) for each day during which a violation continues, or, for multiple violations, a penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for each violation for each day during which a violation continues, a temporary or permanent injunction, or both a penalty and an injunction. Penalties and injunctive relief under this subsection may be recovered in a civil action.

All notices for abatement and cessation orders shall be reported to the director. The director shall:

Issue a notice of assessment, if a cessation order was issued;

Make a determination as to whether a notice of assessment will be issued if a notice for abatement was issued.

Upon issuance of a notice of abatement or cessation order, the director shall inform the operator of the proposed amount of the penalty within thirty (30) days. The amount shall be determined in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the council. The person charged with the penalty shall have fifteen (15) days to request a conference with the director for informal disposition of any dispute over either the amount of the penalty or the occurrence of the violation.

If a conference is held and after the director has determined that a violation did occur and the amount of the penalty is warranted, the person charged with the penalty shall, within fifteen (15) days, either:

Pay the proposed penalty in full; or

Petition the council for review of either the amount of the penalty or the fact of the violation, submitting a bond equal to the proposed amount of the penalty at the time of filing the petition. The bond shall be conditioned for the satisfaction of the penalty in full, or as modified by the council, if the director’s determination as to the occurrence of the violation and the assessment of a penalty is affirmed. The petition is effective when the bond is approved by the council. If the bond is not approved, the person charged with the penalty has ten (10) days to forward the proposed amount to the council for placement in an escrow account to make the petition effective.

If a conference is not requested, the person charged with the penalty has thirty (30) days to take the action required under subsection (d) of this section.

After a petition is effective, the council shall hold a hearing, which shall be conducted as a contested case proceeding under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. The council shall either:

Determine the occurrence of the violation and the amount of penalty which is warranted for the purpose of ordering that the penalty be paid; or

Determine that no violation occurred, or that the amount of the penalty shall be reduced. If such a determination is made, either through administrative or judicial review, the director shall within thirty (30) days remit the appropriate amount to the person, if any deposit has been made, with interest at the rate of six percent (6%), or at the prevailing United States department of treasury rate, whichever is greater. Failure to file an effective petition shall result in a waiver of all legal rights to contest the violation or the amount of the penalty.

Any person aggrieved or adversely affected in fact by a final decision of the council pursuant to this section is entitled to judicial review in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates, or any director, officer or agent of a corporate permittee who willfully and knowingly authorizes, orders or carries out the violation of any provision of article 4 of this act with respect to surface coal mining, or any rule, regulation, standard, permit, license, or variance or limitations adopted thereunder, or who willfully violates any determination or order of the council or court issued pursuant to this section, shall be fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) per day of violation, imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both. For a subsequent conviction for a violation of article 4 of this act with respect to surface coal mining, the person shall be subject to a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) per day of violation, imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, or both. For multiple violations, penalties may be assessed up to the maximum amount specified in this subsection for each day of each separate violation.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation or certification in any application, record, report, plan or other document filed or required to be maintained under article 4 of this act for surface coal mining operations, or who falsifies, tampers with, or knowingly renders inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained under article 4 of this act for surface coal mining operations shall, upon conviction be subject to a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

Any person who shall, except as permitted by law, willfully resist, prevent, impede or interfere with the director, any administrator or any of their agents in the performance of their duties in the regulation of surface coal mining operations under article 4 of this act shall be subject to a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

Any operator of a surface coal mining operation who fails to correct a violation within the period permitted for its correction, or after a final order or decision issues requiring correction when either the department or a court has relieved the operator from the abatement requirements of the notice or order, shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for each day during which the failure or violation continues.

Any person who is injured in his person or property through the violation, by any operator, of any rule, regulation, order or permit issued pursuant to article 4 of this act as it provides for the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation in accordance with the requirements of P.L. 95-87 may bring an action for damages, including reasonable attorney and expert witness fees, only in the judicial district in which the surface coal mining operation complained of is located.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 28, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Former §

35-11-902

, relating to civil or criminal remedies, was renumbered by Laws 1995, ch. 28, § 3 as §

35-11-904

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Federal Reference. —

P.L. 95-87, referred to in subsection (o), appears mainly as 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 35-11-903.
Violations of provisions of act causing damage to wildlife; recoveries; causes of action.

Any person who violates this act, or any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder, and thereby causes the death of fish, aquatic life or game or bird life is, in addition to other penalties provided by this act, liable to pay to the state, an additional sum for the reasonable value of the fish, aquatic life, game or bird life destroyed. Any monies so recovered shall be placed in the game and fish fund.

Except as provided in W.S. 35-11-902(o), nothing in this act shall be construed to abridge, limit, impair, create, enlarge or otherwise affect substantively or procedurally the right of any person to damages or other relief on account of injury to persons or property and to maintain any action or other appropriate proceeding therefor.

All actions pursuant to this article, except actions under W.S. 35-11-902(o), shall be brought in the county in which the violation occurred or in Laramie county by the attorney general in the name of the people of Wyoming. All actions pursuant to this article for the enforcement of any program to administer the provisions of W.S. 35-11-301(a)(iii) and (v) pursuant to the authority delegated under W.S.

35-11-304

may also be brought by the county attorney in the county in which the violation occurred.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 28, § 1; 2005, ch. 157, § 2.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “game and fish fund” for “general fund” in (a).

Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-904.
Civil or criminal remedy.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected, may commence a civil action on his own behalf to compel compliance with this act only to the extent that such action could have been brought in federal district court under Section 520 of P.L. 95-87 [30 U.S.C. § 1270], as that law is worded on August 3, 1977:

Against any governmental entity, for alleged violations of any provisions of this act or of any rule, regulation, order or permit issued pursuant thereto, or against any other person for alleged violations of any rule, regulation, order or permit issued pursuant to this act; or

Against the state of Wyoming, department of environmental quality, for alleged failure of the department to perform any act or duty under this act which is not discretionary with the department.

Actions against the state of Wyoming, department of environmental quality, pursuant to this section shall be filed in the district court for Laramie county. Actions against any governmental entity, or any other person pursuant to this section shall be filed in the district court for the county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred.

No action pursuant to this section may be commenced:

Prior to sixty (60) days after the plaintiff has given notice in writing of the violation and of his intent to commence the civil action to the department and the alleged violator, except that such action may be brought immediately after such notification if the violation complained of constitutes an imminent threat to the health or safety of the plaintiff or would immediately affect a legal interest of the plaintiff; or

If the department, through the attorney general, has commenced a civil action to require compliance with the provisions of this act, or any rule, regulation, order or permit issued pursuant to this act, but in any such action any person may intervene as a matter of right.

The state of Wyoming, department of environmental quality, may intervene as a matter of right in any action filed pursuant to this section.

The court, in issuing any final order in any action brought pursuant to this section, may award costs of litigation, (including attorney and expert witness fees), to any party whenever the court determines such award is appropriate.

The availability of judicial review established pursuant to W.S.

16-3-114

shall not be construed to limit the operation of rights established in this section.

Nothing in this act shall in any way limit any existing civil or criminal remedy for any wrongful action arising out of a violation of any provision of this act or any rule, regulation, standard, permit, license, or variance or order adopted hereunder.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.50; Laws 1980, ch. 64, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

35-11-902

; Laws 1995, ch. 28, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section was formerly §

35-11-902

, and was renumbered as §

35-11-904

by Laws 1995, ch. 28, § 3.

Surface Mining Act. —

Section 520 of P.L. 95-87, referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), appears as the federal Surface Mining Act at 30 U.S.C. § 1270.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a), (c) and (g), see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Personal harm not prerequisite to bringing action. —

This section allows an action to be brought by interested parties who may be adversely affected, in which no actual personal harm is complained of but merely the violation of the rules and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter. Belle Fourche Pipeline Co. v. Elmore Livestock Co., 669 P.2d 505,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1983).

But proper notice prerequisite. —

Where an action can only be construed to have been brought as a private attorney general under subsection (a)(i), such action is procedurally defective if the plaintiff fails to provide both the department of environmental quality and the alleged violator with the proper notice required in subsection (c)(i). Belle Fourche Pipeline Co. v. Elmore Livestock Co., 669 P.2d 505,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

Stalkup v. State Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 838 P.2d 705,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

Library references. —

17 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 161.

18 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 53.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Standing to sue for violation of state environmental regulatory statute, 66 ALR4th 685.

What constitutes “suit” triggering insurer's duty to defend environmental claims — state cases, 48 ALR5th 355.

Construction and application of 42 USC § 7604(d) pertaining to recovering costs of litigation in suits under Clean Air Act, 85 ALR Fed 118.

Necessity of proof of scienter under statute fixing criminal penalties for hazardous waste violations (42 USC § 6928(d)), 106 ALR Fed 836.

What constitutes “disposal” for Purposes of owner or operator liability under § 107(a)(2) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 USCS § 9607(a)(2)), 136 ALR Fed 117.

Private entity's status as owner or operator under § 107(a)(1, 2) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (42 USCS § 9607(a)(1, 2) (CERCLA), 140 ALR Fed 181.